Vermont, session 2025-2026, H62.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. REPEAL
10 V.S.A. chapter 24 (Vermont Climate Council and Climate Action Plan)
is repealed.
Sec. 2. 10 V.S.A. § 578 is amended to read:
§ 578. GREENHOUSE GAS REDUCTION REQUIREMENTS GOALS
(a) Greenhouse gas reduction requirements goals. It is the goal of Vermont
shall to reduce emissions of greenhouse gases from within the geographical
boundaries of the State and those emissions outside the boundaries of the State
that are caused by the use of energy in Vermont, as measured and inventoried
pursuant to section 582 of this title, by:
* * *
(c) Implementation of State programs to reduce greenhouse gas emissions.
In order to facilitate the State’s compliance with the goals established in this
section, all State agencies shall consider, whenever practicable, any increase or
decrease in greenhouse gas emissions in their decision-making procedures with
respect to the purchase and use of equipment and goods; the siting,
construction, and maintenance of buildings; the assignment of personnel; and
the planning, design, and operation of programs, services, and infrastructure.
* * *
VT LEG #379037 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.62
2025 Page 3 of 4
Sec. 3. 30 V.S.A. § 202a is amended to read:
§ 202a. STATE ENERGY POLICY
It is the general policy of the State of Vermont:
* * *
(3) To meet Vermont’s energy service needs in a manner that will
achieve the greenhouse gas emissions reductions requirements goals pursuant
to 10 V.S.A § 578 and is consistent with the Vermont Climate Action Plan
adopted and updated pursuant to 10 V.S.A. § 592.
Sec. 4. 30 V.S.A. § 202b is amended to read:
§ 202b. STATE COMPREHENSIVE ENERGY PLAN
(a) The Department of Public Service, in conjunction with other State
agencies designated by the Governor, shall prepare a State Comprehensive
Energy Plan covering at least a 20-year period. The Plan shall seek to
implement the State energy policy set forth in section 202a of this title,
including meeting the State’s greenhouse gas emissions reductions
requirements goals pursuant to 10 V.S.A. § 578, and shall be consistent with
the relevant goals of 24 V.S.A. § 4302 and with the Vermont Climate Action
Plan adopted and updated pursuant to 10 V.S.A. § 592. The State
Comprehensive Energy Plan shall include:
* * *
VT LEG #379037 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.62
2025 Page 4 of 4
Sec. 5. RULE REPEAL
Department of Environmental Conservation, Chapter 40: Vermont Low
Emission Vehicle and Zero Emission Vehicle Rules (CVR 12-30-40) is
repealed.
Sec. 6. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #379037 v.1